Maryland, session 2025, HB1440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–505.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A CIRCUIT COURTHOUSE THAT IS
CONSTRUCTED OR UNDERGOES A MAJOR RENOVATION PROJECT ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(B) A CIRCUIT COURTHOUSE SHALL MAINTAIN ON ITS PREMISES A PRIVATE
LACTATION ROOM THAT MAY BE USED BY EMPLOYEES OF THE COURT AND MEMBERS
OF THE PUBLIC TO NURSE AND EXPRESS BREAST MILK.
(C) THE LACTATION ROOM REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
– 1 –

Ch. 137 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) A CHAIR WITH A TABLE AND ELECTRICAL OUTLET NEARBY TO
ACCOMMODATE PLACEMENT OF A BREAST PUMP DEVICE;
(2) A DOOR THAT MAY BE LOCKED FROM THE INSIDE;
(3) A SINK; AND
(4) A REFRIGERATOR.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “BREAST–FEEDING MOTHER” MEANS A MOTHER WHO IS FEEDING HER
CHILD BREAST MILK, EITHER DIRECTLY FROM HER BREAST OR BY EXPRESSING AND
BOTTLE–FEEDING THE CHILD.
[(b)] (C) (1) “Jury commissioner” means an individual who is designated
under a jury plan to manage jury selection and service.
(2) “Jury commissioner” includes an acting jury commissioner who is
designated in accordance with a jury plan.
[(c)] (D) “Jury plan” means a plan that the circuit court for a county adopts
under this title to govern jury selection and service for the county.
[(d)] (E) “Prospective juror” means an individual whose name is selected from a
source pool but who has not yet been screened for disqualification, excusal, or exemption.
[(e)] (F) “Qualified juror” means an individual who, after selection as a
prospective juror, is not disqualified, excused, or exempted.
[(f)] (G) “Source pool” means a pool from which the name of each prospective
juror is to be selected as provided under a jury plan.
8–402.
(a) Subject to the requirements of this section, a jury judge or, if a county’s jury
plan allows, its jury commissioner may disqualify, excuse, or exempt an individual who is
summoned for jury service or reschedule jury service.
(b) An individual may be disqualified only on the basis of information provided
on a juror questionnaire or during an interview or other competent evidence.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 137
(c) (1) To be excused, an individual shall show, on a juror questionnaire,
during an interview, or by other competent evidence, that [extreme]:
(I) EXTREME inconvenience, public necessity, or undue hardship
requires excusal;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL IS A BREAST–FEEDING MOTHER; OR
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS LEGAL CUSTODY OF AND IS
PERSONALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR A CHILD UNDER THE AGE OF 4 3 YEARS REQUIRING
CONTINUOUS CARE BY THE INDIVIDUAL DURING NORMAL COURT HOURS.
(2) A JURY JUDGE OR JURY COMMISSIONER MAY, BUT IS NOT
REQUIRED TO, EXCUSE AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OR (III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) An individual may be excused:
(i) Only for the period that the jury judge or jury commissioner
considers necessary; and
(ii) Not more than twice unless the jury judge finds that the
individual has shown an extraordinary circumstance that requires an additional excuse.
(3) (4) When the period set under this subsection expires, a jury
commissioner again shall summon the individual for jury service.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE MARYLAND JUDICIARY SHALL COLLECT AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR:
(I) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS REQUESTING TO BE
EXCUSED FOR JURY DUTY UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS GRANTED OR DENIED AN
EXCUSAL UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE INFORMATION REPORTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) JURISDICTION;
– 3 –

Ch. 137 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE TYPE OF EXCUSAL REQUESTED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) WHETHER THE EXCUSAL REQUEST WAS GRANTED OR
DENIED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –